Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-603
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the definitions found in sections 9-603.02 to 9-618 shall be used.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 174;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 48;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 45;

Laws 2003, LB 3, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB490, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB259, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 5.